Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.205

Attendance and participation at hearing for appointment of guardian for minor.

(1) The court shall allow a minor who is the subject of a hearing under RCW 11.130.195 to attend the hearing and allow the minor to participate in the hearing unless the court determines that:

(a) The minor lacks the ability or maturity to participate meaningfully in the hearing; or

(b) Attendance would be harmful to the minor.

(2) Unless excused by the court for good cause, the person proposed to be appointed as guardian for a minor shall attend a hearing under RCW 11.130.195.

(3) Each parent of a minor who is the subject of a hearing under RCW 11.130.195 has the right to attend the hearing.

(4) A person may request permission to participate in a hearing under RCW 11.130.195. The court may grant the request, with or without hearing, on determining that it is in the best interest of the minor who is the subject of the hearing. The court may impose appropriate conditions on the person's participation.

[ 2020 c 312 s 104; 2019 c 437 s 205.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.